Illinois, session 104th, SB2318.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Banking Act is amended by changing 5Section 46 as follows: 6    (205 ILCS 5/46)  (from Ch. 17, par. 357)7    Sec. 46. Misleading practices and names prohibited; 8penalty. 9    (a) No person, firm, partnership, or corporation that is 10not a bank shall transact business in this State in a manner 11which has a substantial likelihood of misleading the public by 12implying that the business is a bank, or shall use the word 13"bank", "banker", or "banking" in connection with the 14business. Any person, firm, partnership or corporation 15violating this Section shall be deemed guilty of a Class A 16misdemeanor, and the Attorney General or State's Attorney of 17the county in which any such violation occurs may restrain 18such violation by a complaint for injunctive relief.19    (b) If the Commissioner is of the opinion and finds that a 20person, firm, partnership, or corporation that is not a bank 21has transacted or intends to transact business in this State 22in a manner which has a substantial likelihood of misleading 23the public by implying that the business is a bank, or has used   SB2318 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11891 BAB 21982 b1or intends to use the word "bank", "banker", or "banking" in 2connection with the business, then the Commissioner may direct 3that person, firm, partnership, or corporation to cease and 4desist from transacting the business or using the word "bank", 5"banker", or "banking". If that person, firm, partnership, or 6corporation persists in transacting the business or using the 7word "bank", "banker", or "banking", then the Commissioner may 8impose a civil penalty of up to $10,000 for each violation. 9Each day that the person, firm, partnership, or corporation 10continues transacting the business or using the word "bank", 11"banker", or "banking" in connection with the business shall 12constitute a separate violation of these provisions.13    (c) A person, firm, partnership, or corporation that is 14not a bank, and is not transacting or intending to transact 15business in this State in a manner that has a substantial 16likelihood of misleading the public by implying that such 17business is a bank, may apply to the Commissioner for 18permission to use the word "bank", "banker", or "banking" in 19connection with the business. If the Commissioner determines 20that there is no substantial likelihood of misleading the 21public, and upon such conditions as the Commissioner may 22impose to prevent the person, firm, partnership, or 23corporation from holding itself out in a misleading manner, 24then such person, firm, partnership, or corporation may use 25the word "bank", "banker", or "banking". 26        (d) (1) Unless otherwise expressly permitted by law,   SB2318 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 11891 BAB 21982 b1    no person, firm, partnership, or corporation may use the 2    name of an existing bank when marketing to or soliciting 3    business from customers or prospective customers if the 4    reference to the existing bank is made without the consent 5    of the existing bank. 6        (1.5) Unless otherwise expressly permitted by law, no 7    person, firm, partnership, or corporation may use a name 8    similar to that of an existing bank when marketing to or 9    soliciting business from customers or prospective 10    customers if the similar name is used in a manner that 11    could cause a reasonable person to believe that the 12    marketing material or solicitation originated from or is 13    endorsed by the existing bank or that the existing bank is 14    in any other way responsible for the marketing material or 15    solicitation. 16        (2) An existing bank may, in addition to any other 17    remedies available under the law, report an alleged 18    violation of this subsection (d) to the Commissioner. If 19    the Commissioner finds the marketing material or 20    solicitation in question to be in violation of this 21    subsection, the Commissioner may direct the person, firm, 22    partnership, or corporation to cease and desist from using 23    that marketing material or solicitation in Illinois. If 24    that person, firm, partnership, or corporation persists in 25    the use of the marketing material or solicitation, then 26    the Commissioner may impose a civil penalty of up to   SB2318 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 11891 BAB 21982 b1    $10,000 for each violation. Each instance in which the 2    marketing material or solicitation is sent to a customer 3    or prospective customer shall constitute a separate 4    violation of these provisions. The Commissioner is 5    authorized to adopt promulgate rules to administer these 6    provisions. 7        (3) (Blank).8    (e) If a person, firm, partnership, or corporation that 9(i) does not accept insured deposits as a substantial portion 10of its operations and (ii) is not chartered by a State or the 11United States violates subsection (a), (b), or (c) of this 12Section, the Commissioner may impose a civil penalty of up to 13the maximum amount permitted under paragraph (8) of Section 48 14of this Act for each violation. 15(Source: P.A. 92-476, eff. 8-23-01; 92-811, eff. 8-21-02.)